North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4. Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.
§ 135-64.
Benefits on death after retirement.

In the event of the death of a former member while in receipt of a retirement allowance pursuant to his retirement under the provisions of

G.S. 135-57

, or after a former member’s sixty-fifth birthday while in receipt of a retirement allowance pursuant to his retirement under the provisions of

G.S. 135-59

, there shall be paid to the former member’s surviving spouse, if any, an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the first day of the calendar month next following the date of death
of the former member and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The amount of any such allowance shall be equal to one half of the allowance that was payable to
the former member for the month immediately prior to his month of death, or which would have been so payable had an optional mode of payment not been elected under the provisions of

G.S. 135-61

, reduced by two percent (2%) thereof for each full year, if any, by which the age of the former member at date of death exceeds that of his spouse.

In the event of the death of a former member prior to his sixty-fifth birthday while in receipt of a retirement allowance pursuant to his retirement under the provisions of

G.S. 135-59

, there shall be paid to the former member’s surviving spouse, if any, an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the first day of the calendar month next following the date of death
of the former member and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The amount of any such allowance shall be equal to one half of the allowance to which the former
member would have been entitled under the provisions of

G.S. 135-58

if he had remained in service from his disability retirement date to his date of death with no change in his final compensation or status and had then retired, reduced by two percent (2%) thereof for each full year,
if any, by which the age of the former member at date of death exceeds that of his spouse.

In the event of the death of a former member while in receipt of a retirement allowance under the provisions of

G.S. 135-58

, 135-60, or 135-61, if such former member is not survived by a spouse to whom a retirement allowance is payable under the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (b) above, nor survived by a beneficiary to whom
a monthly survivorship benefit is payable under one of the optional modes of payment under

G.S. 135-61

, there shall be paid to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of
Trustees, if such person is living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives, a death benefit equal to the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions of the member at his date of retirement
over the total of the retirement allowances paid to him prior to his death.

In the event that a retirement allowance becomes payable to the spouse of a former member under the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (b) above, or to the designated survivor of a former member under one of the optional modes of payment under

G.S. 135-61

, and such retirement allowance to the spouse shall terminate on the remarriage or death of the spouse, or on the death of the designated survivor, before the total of the retirement allowances paid to the former
member and his spouse or designated survivor combined equals the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions at his date of retirement, the excess of such accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowances
paid to the former member and his spouse or designated survivor combined shall be paid in a lump sum to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written
designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person is living at the time such payment falls due, otherwise to the former member’s legal representatives.

In the event of the death of a retired former judge while in receipt of a retirement allowance under the provisions of G.S. 135-58(d), there shall be paid to the former judge’s surviving spouse, if any, an annual retirement allowance payable monthly,
which shall commence on the first day of the calendar month next following the date of death of the former judge and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The
amount of any such allowance shall be equal to one half of the allowance that was payable to the former judge for the month immediately prior to his month of death, reduced by two percent (2%) thereof for each full year, if any,
by which the age of the former judge at date of death exceeds that of his spouse.

There shall be paid to the surviving unremarried spouse of any former judge who died prior to January 1, 1974, while in receipt of a retirement allowance under the provisions of a previous system, a retirement allowance which shall commence on January
1, 1974, and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The amount of any such retirement allowance shall be equal to one half of the allowance that would have been
payable to the former judge for the month of December 1973, if the previous system had been in effect at his date of retirement and if he had survived to January 1, 1974, reduced by two percent (2%) thereof for each full year,
if any, by which the age of the former judge at date of death exceeded that of his spouse.

Upon the death of a retired member on or after July 1, 1988, but before January 1, 1999, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived
by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis,
through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings
Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur
before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s
contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon the death of a retired member on or after January 1, 1999, but before July 1, 2004, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived
by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis,
through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings
Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur
before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s
contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon the death of a retired member on or after July 1, 2004, but before July 1, 2007, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived by
a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through
retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and
Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of nine thousand dollars ($9,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before
the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions
required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon the death of a retired member on or after July 1, 2007, but before January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the surviving spouse of a deceased retired member or to the deceased retired member’s legal representative if not survived
by a spouse; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of his death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis,
through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust fund administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings
Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. This death benefit shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur
before the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s surviving spouse or legal representative if not survived by a spouse shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s
contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

Upon the death of a retired member on or after January 1, 2015, there shall be paid a death benefit to the person or persons designated by the member or, if the member has not designated a beneficiary, to the surviving spouse of the deceased retired member
or, if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, to the deceased retired member’s legal representative; provided the retired member has elected, when first eligible, to make, and has continuously made, in advance of the
member’s death required contributions as determined by the Board of Trustees on a fully contributory basis, through retirement allowance deductions or other methods adopted by the Board of Trustees, to a group death benefit trust
fund, the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Benefit Trust, administered by the Board of Trustees separate and apart from the Retirement System’s Annuity Savings Fund and Pension Accumulation Fund. Employer and non-employer
contributions to the Benefit Trust and earnings on those contributions are irrevocable. The assets of the Benefit Trust are dedicated to providing benefits to members and beneficiaries in accordance with the Plan’s benefit terms.
The assets of the Benefit Trust are not subject to the claims of creditors of the employees and non-employees making contributions to the Benefit Trust, are not subject to the claims of any creditors of the Benefit Trust’s trustees
and administrators, and are not subject to the claims of creditors of members and beneficiaries. Benefit Trust assets may be used for reasonable expenses to administer benefits provided by the Fund as approved by the Board of Trustees.The
death benefit payable under this subsection shall be a lump-sum payment in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) upon the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection. Should death occur before
the completion of 24 months of contributions required under this subsection, the deceased retired member’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, or surviving spouse if there is no surviving designated beneficiary, or legal representative
if not survived by a designated beneficiary or spouse, shall be paid the sum of the retired member’s contributions required by this subsection plus interest to be determined by the Board of Trustees.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1987, c. 824, s. 4; 1995, c. 509, s. 76; 1998-212, s. 28.27(b), (c); 2004-147, ss. 5, 6; 2005-91, ss. 5, 6; 2007-496, s. 4; 2009-66, ss. 11(c), (d); 2014-112, s. 3(b), (c); 2017-129, s. 2(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-91, ss. 5 and 6, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (c), substituted “G.S. 135-58, 135-60, or 135-61” for “G.S. 135-58 or 135-60 (but not 135-61)” and inserted “nor survived by a beneficiary to whom a monthly survivorship benefit
is payable under one of the optional modes of payment under

G.S. 135-61

”; and in subsection (d), substituted “or to the designated survivor of a former member” for “provided that the member’s retirement allowance had not been paid,” inserted “or on the death of the designated survivor,”
and inserted “or designated survivor” twice.

Session Laws 2007-496, s. 4, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to eligible retirees who die on or after that date, in subsection (i), inserted “but before July 1, 2007” in the first sentence, and added the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 11(c) and (d), effective July 1, 2009, inserted “electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by” in subsections (c) and (d).

Session Laws 2014-112, s. 3(b), (c), effective January 1, 2015, deleted the second paragraph of subsection (i), which pertained to the death benefit payable to a surviving spouse or legal representative of a deceased retired member who died on or after
July 1, 2007, and added subsections (j) and (k).

Session Laws 2017-129, s. 2(u), effective June 30, 2017, in subsection (k), substituted “the member’s death required contributions” for “his death required contributions” and inserted “the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Benefit Trust” in
the first sentence, and inserted the present second through fifth sentences in the first paragraph, and substituted “The death benefit payable under this subsection” for “This death benefit” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 135-65.
Post-retirement increases in allowances.

Commencing with the post-retirement adjustment, effective July 1, 1974, all retirement allowances payable under the provisions of this Article shall be adjusted annually in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 135-5(o).

Increases in Benefits Paid to Members Retired prior to July 1, 1978. — Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1978, which shall become payable on July 1, 1979,
as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall be the current maximum four percent (4%) plus an additional one percent (1%) to a total of five percent (5%) for the year 1979 only. The provisions of this subsection
shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant of a beneficiary.

Increases in Benefits Paid to Members Retired prior to July 1, 1979. — Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the increase in allowance to each beneficiary on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1979, which shall become payable on July 1, 1980, shall
be the current maximum four percent (4%) plus an additional six percent (6%) to a total of ten percent (10%) for the year 1980-81 only. The provisions of this subsection shall apply also to the allowance of a surviving annuitant
of a beneficiary.

Increases in Benefits Paid to Members Retired Prior to July 1, 1982. — From and after July 1, 1983, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of July 1, 1982, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the
allowance payable on July 1, 1982, provided the increase in retirement allowances shall be payable in accordance with all requirements, stipulations and conditions set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

Increase in Benefits Paid to Members Retired on or before July 1, 1983. — From and after July 1, 1984, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1983, shall be increased by eight percent
(8%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1983.

From and after July 1, 1985, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1984, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1984. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 1985, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1984, but before June 30, 1985, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1984, and June 30, 1985.

From and after July 1, 1986, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1985, shall be increased by three and eight-tenths percent (3.8%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1985. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1986, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1985, but before June 30, 1986, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and eight-tenths
percent (3.8%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1985 and June 30, 1986.

From and after July 1, 1987, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1986, shall be increased by four percent (4.0%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1986. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 1987, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1986, but before June 30, 1987, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4.0%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1986, and June 30, 1987.

From and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1987, shall be increased by three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1987. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1988, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1987, but before June 30, 1988, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and six-tenths percent
(3.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1987, and June 30, 1988.

From and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1988, shall be increased by three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1988. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1989, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1988, but before June 30, 1989, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and one-half percent
(3.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1988, and June 30, 1989.

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1990. — From and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1990, shall be increased by six-tenths percent
(0.6%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1990. This allowance shall be calculated on the basis of the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1990, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1989
Session of the General Assembly (1990 Regular Session).

From and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1989, shall be increased by six and one-tenth percent (6.1%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1989. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1990, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1989, but before June 30, 1990, shall be increased by a prorated amount of six and one-tenth percent
(6.1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1989, and June 30, 1990.

From and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1991, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1991. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1992, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1991, but before June 30, 1992, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent
(1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1991 and June 30, 1992.

From and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1992, shall be increased by one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1992. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1993, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1992, but before June 30, 1993, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and six-tenths percent
(1.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1992, and June 30, 1993.

From and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1993, shall be increased by three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1993. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1994, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1993, but before June 30, 1994, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and one-half percent
(3.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1993, and June 30, 1994.

From and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1994, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1994. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1994, but before June 30, 1995, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1994, and June 30, 1995.

From and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1995, shall be increased by four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the allowance payable on July 1, 1995. Furthermore,
from and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1995, but before June 30, 1996, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four and four-tenths
percent (4.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 1996.

From and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1996, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1997. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1996, but before June 30, 1997, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 1997.

From and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1997, shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1998. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1997, but before June 30, 1998, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and one-half percent
(2.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998.

From and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1998, shall be increased by two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 1999. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1998, but before June 30, 1999, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and three-tenths percent
(2.3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1998, and June 30, 1999.

From and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1999, shall be increased by two and six-tenths percent (2.6%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2000. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1999, but before June 30, 2000, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and six-tenths percent
(2.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1999, and June 30, 2000.

From and after July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2000, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2001. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2000, but before June 30, 2001, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2001.

From and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2001, shall be increased by one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2002. Furthermore,
from and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2001, but before June 30, 2002, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and four-tenths percent
(1.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002.

From and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2002, shall be increased by one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2003.
Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2002, but before June 30, 2003, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and twenty-eight
hundredths percent (1.28%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2002, and June 30, 2003.

From and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2003, shall be increased by one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2004, in accordance
with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2003, but before June 30, 2004, shall be increased by a prorated
amount of one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2003, and June 30, 2004.

From and after July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2004, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2005. Furthermore, from and after
July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2004, but before June 30, 2005, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable
as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005.

(aa)
From and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2005, shall be increased by three percent (3%) of the allowance payable on
June 1, 2006. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2005, but before June 30, 2006, shall be increased by a prorated amount
of three percent (3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2006.

(bb)
From and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2006, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2007. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2006, but before June 30, 2007, shall be increased by a
prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2007.

(cc)
From and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2007, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2008. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2007, but before June 30, 2008, shall be increased by a
prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2007, and June 30, 2008.

(dd)
From and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2011, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2012. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2011, but before June 30, 2012, shall be increased by a prorated amount
of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2011, and June 30, 2012.

(ee)
From and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2013, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2014. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2013, but before June 30, 2014, shall be increased by a prorated amount
of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2013, and June 30, 2014.

(ff)
On or before October 31, 2016, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2016, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2016. The payment shall be one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2016, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary
dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(gg)
From and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2016, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2017. Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2016, but before June 30, 2017, shall be increased by a prorated amount
of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2016, and June 30, 2017.

(hh)
On or before October 31, 2018, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2018, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2018. The payment shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2018, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before
the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(ii)
On or before December 31, 2021, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2021, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2021. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2021, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before
the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(jj)
After September 1, 2022, but on or before October 31, 2022, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2022, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2022. The payment shall be three percent (3%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2022, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement.
If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1979, c. 838, s. 104; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 69; 1983, c. 761, s. 221; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 224; 1985, c. 479, s. 189(b); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 49(b); 1987, c. 738,
s. 27(b); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 22(b); 1989, c. 752, s. 41(b); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1077, ss. 8, 9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 53(c); 1993, c. 321, s. 74(f); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(n);
1995, c. 507, s. 7.22(b); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.21(b); 1997-443, s. 33.22(e); 1998-153, s. 21(b); 1999-237, s. 28.23(b); 2000-67, s. 26.20(e); 2001-424, s. 32.22(b); 2002-126, s. 28.8(c); 2003-284, s. 30.17(b); 2004-124,
s. 31.17(b); 2005-276, s. 29.25(b); 2006-66, s. 22.18(c); 2007-323, s. 28.20(b); 2008-107, s. 26.23(b); 2012-142, s. 25.13(b); 2014-100, s. 35.14(b); 2016-94, s. 36.21(b); 2017-57, s. 35.19A(b); 2018-5, s. 35.28(b); 2021-180, s. 39.23(b).

§ 135-66.
Administration; management of funds; method of financing.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of this Retirement System and shall invest them in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

The assets of this Retirement System shall include employers’ contributions held with the Pension Accumulation Fund established under

G.S. 135-8

and employees’ contributions held in the Annuity Savings Fund similarly established under

G.S. 135-8

.

The Board of Trustees shall have performed an annual actuarial valuation of the System and shall have the financial responsibility for maintaining the System on a generally accepted actuarial basis.

An actuarially determined employer contribution shall be calculated annually by the actuary using assumptions and a cost method approved by the Actuarial Standards Board of the American Academy of Actuaries and selected by the Board of Trustees.

Notwithstanding Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Board of Trustees may adopt a contribution policy that would recommend a contribution not less than the actuarially determined employer contribution.

The recommended employer contribution rate by the Board of Trustees each year shall not be less than the actuarially determined employer contribution.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1979, c. 467, s. 18; 2020-48, s. 1.6.